Ohio, session 136, HB637.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That section 3710.30 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 3710.30. (A) Except as otherwise provided in Chapter 3781. or 3791. of the Revised Code or rules adopted under them, a person may use recycled asphalt roofing shingles in any form of roadway construction or any other construction project so long as such shingles do not contain asbestos, asbestos tailings, or asbestos-containing waste material. (B) The director of environmental protection shall adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code to provide for the administration and enforcement of this section, including the testing of recycled asphalt roofing shingles.